Massachusetts, session 194th, H1871.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 24 of chapter 90 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 766
and 767, the words “recklessly, or operates such a vehicle”.
SECTION 2. Said paragraph (a) of said subdivision (2) of said section 24 of said chapter
90, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following
4 paragraphs:-
Whoever upon any way or in any place to which the public has a right of access, or any
place to which members of the public have access as invitees or licensees, operates a motor
vehicle recklessly, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 5
of 2

years, or by imprisonment for not more than 2½ years in a jail or house of correction and by a
fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000.
Whoever upon any way or in any place to which the public has a right of access, or any
place to which members of the public have access as invitees or licensees, operates a motor
vehicle recklessly and by such operation causes the serious bodily injury of any person, shall be
punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 10 years, or by imprisonment for
not less than 1 year nor more than 2½ years in a jail or house of correction and by a fine of not
less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000. For the purpose of this section the term “serious bodily
injury” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision (3) of section 24L.
Whoever upon any way or in any place to which the public has a right of access, or any
place to which members of the public have access as invitees or licensees, operates a motor
vehicle recklessly, and by such reckless operation causes the death of another, shall be punished
by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 20 years, and by a fine of not more than
$25,000.
For purposes of this section “reckless” shall be defined as: violating 1 or more moving
violations while traveling at least 25 miles per hour over the speed limit.
SECTION 3. Subsection (a) of section 24G of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 9, the words “recklessly or”.
of 2